

Enhance Product Development | Submit Your Invention Idea















Develop & Launch Your Invention or Product Idea












Do You Have a New Invention Idea?
If you have an invention idea or new product, we want to hear from you. At Enhance Product Development, we help inventors develop and launch their new invention ideas. Simply put, "We turn ideas into REALITY."
So if you are an entrepreneur who has been working on a new invention for years or if you're an inventor who just came up with a new idea for a product, we can help!


Request FREE Inventor Information
100% Confidential. No Obligation Consultation.
* denotes required fields




Name*: 



Email*: 



Country*:

United States of America
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Canada
United Kingdom
Australia
New Zealand
Ireland
South Africa
Afghanistan
Albania
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald
Holy See (Vatican)
Honduras
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iraq
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgystan
Lao
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia (FYR)
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
Neutral Zone
New Caledonia
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Georgia
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (U.K.)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe



Address*: 



City*:



State/Region:


 - select - 
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
American Samoa
Guam
Northern Mariana Islands
Puerto Rico
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Virgin Islands




Zip/Postal Code*:



Phone*:



 











All information provided remains confidential.



Must be 18 years or older.










What Enhance Clients Are Saying





“Customer service is A+, you guys have been amazing!”
Erik R., New Brunswick, NJ
“My experience with Enhance was unbelievable. I am almost at a loss for words actually. Everything from the consultation to the sketches was terrific. Words can't explain how impressed I was with the effort and how everything was completed in a timely manner.”
Theodis H., Honolulu, HI


“I am more than impressed & highly recommend the services that Enhance Product Development offered and delivered!”
Becky B., Kalamazoo, MI
“The 3D renderings, logo and sell sheet were awesome! I was very pleased with the feedback that was provided along the way. Lastly, I'm extremely pleased on how quick my rough drawings came alive for me...”
Joe K., Dubuque, IA







Wal-Mart®, Bed Bath and Beyond®, Home Depot®, Toys'R'Us®, Walgreens®, Lowes®, Target®, Kmart®, Dick's Sporting Goods®, and Cabela's® are registered trademarks of their respective companies. The display of trademarks and logos does not imply an endorsement of Enhance Product Development, Inc. by the trademark owners. New product development is highly speculative and the use of Enhance Product Development's services does not typically result in a license deal or profit to the inventor.
For Free Information Call 1-877-993-6426











Follow Us: 

© Copyright 2014. Enhance Product Development, Inc. | Privacy




 



Intralink-Spine, Inc. Announces Long-Term Large-Animal Testing Shows Positive Results Related to Lower Back Pain | Business Wire
























































Intralink-Spine, Inc. Announces Long-Term Large-Animal Testing Shows 
      Positive Results Related to Lower Back Pain






July 01, 2015 10:27 AM Eastern Daylight Time



LEXINGTON, Ky.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Intralink-Spine, Inc. (ILS) is pleased to announce the completion of the 
      phase 1 long-term large-animal in vivo testing for the Réjuve treatment 
      for lower back pain.
    


      “The purpose of this study was to verify and validate the final design 
      and safety of the Réjuve device in a six month large-animal (sheep) 
      model. The sheep received fluoroscopic image-guided injections of Réjuve 
      in two lumbar intervertebral discs, with two posterolateral injections 
      per treated level,” states Dr. Tom Hedman. “No infections, clinically 
      relevant or chronic inflammation, or behavioral or neuromuscular effects 
      were seen in the animals over the course of the six month study. This 
      study showed that the procedure to inject Réjuve is safe and can be 
      effectively administered using only standard fluoroscopic techniques.”
    

      According to Lyle Hawkins, CEO of Intralink-Spine, “This is another 
      significant milestone for the Réjuve treatment. This study clearly shows 
      the safety and simplicity of the Réjuve treatment. We’re excited about 
      these results and what this treatment means to those suffering from 
      lower back pain; Réjuve is truly going to be a disruptive breakthrough 
      for the treatment of lower back pain.” Learn more at www.IntralinkSpine.com.
    

      According to Dr. Hedman, CSO of Intralink-Spine and a leading researcher 
      in soft-tissue biomechanics, “Réjuve works in the same manner as the 
      body’s natural response to heal instability and degradation of the 
      spinal disc. The Réjuve device immediately strengthens and stabilizes 
      the disc upon injection to reduce the pain of the patient and eliminate 
      future episodes of debilitating back pain.”
    

      “Réjuve creates permanent molecular bonds, so we’re hopeful that two, 
      perhaps even one set of injections are all a patient will ever need to 
      receive permanent lower back pain relief”, says Hawkins. “And, Réjuve is 
      a much simpler and less expensive treatment than what is being 
      considered with stem cells.”
    

      About 80 percent of the adults in the U.S. experience significant back 
      pain at some point in their life and most back pain sufferers find no 
      relief. In fact, low back pain (LBP) is a challenging condition to treat 
      and one of the most common health problems in the United States for a 
      host of reasons including widespread obesity, an aging population, job 
      related activities or inactivity, and smoking.
    


Contacts

      Intralink-Spine, Inc.Lyle Hawkins, 502-419-8099LHawkins@IntralinkSpine.com














Release Summary
Intralink-Spine, Inc. (ILS) is pleased to announce the completion of the phase 1 long-term large-animal in vivo testing for the Réjuve treatment for lower back pain.






Contacts

      Intralink-Spine, Inc.Lyle Hawkins, 502-419-8099LHawkins@IntralinkSpine.com







 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version




















Online Exchange login from IntraLinks for secure business transactions









































English (US) 



















Securing Business
Beyond Boundaries











Test

Welcome to Intralinks





Email
                                                            Address

 



Password

 




Forgot
                                                                your Password?


Log
                                                                In
Help?







Forgot your
                                                    Password?

Enter
                                                        your email address and Intralinks will send
                                                        you a link to reset your password.

 
Your
                                                            password must be at least 5 characters
                                                            long




Confirm
                                                            email address   Please
                                                            enter the same email as above



Cancel
Submit





Security
                                                    Question

Please answer
                                                        the following security question:

What
                                                            is your mother's maiden name?








 
 Show my typing
                                                        



Cancel Submit



Scheduled Maintenance is in Progress




Security Question



Please
                                                            answer the following security question:

What is your mother's
                                                                maiden name?









 Show
                                                                my typing






Cancel
Submit





This Link Has Expired
This link to reset your password has expired.
Request another one.
























 Need Help?
1 (888) 546-5383
support@intralinks.com
 Browser & System Support

Global Phone Support (24x7)
Help & Downloads
Browser & System Requirements







© 2017 Intralinks, Inc. All rights reserved. User subject to End User Agreement.
 Legal Notices    Privacy Policy










Intralink-Spine Inc. Company Profile




























































BioPortfolio
Biotech, Healthcare and Medical Resources































Advertisement

Topics


All Topics
Biotechnology
Biotech Business
Biotech Products
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Dermatology
Drug Discovery
Endocrinology
Gastroenterology
Immunology
Infectious Diseases
Mental Health
Neurology
Obstetrics
Orthopedics
Public Health
Respiratory
Rheumatology
Urology 
			Track topics on Twitter
Track topics that are important to you




Printed From BioPortfolio.com

Intralink-Spine Inc. Company Profile

02:25 EDT 29th July 2017 | BioPortfolio










Intralink-Spine Inc. (ILS) is privately held by Orthopeutics LP (OLP, Georgetown, TX) and a group of angel investors.  OLP is a biotechnology innovator founded in September of 2004 to develop and commercialize revolutionary non-surgical solutions for common orthopaedic problems.  OLP's general partner is Ampac Biotechnology, Inc. also located in Georgetown, TX.  Ampac was founded in 2001 when it was awarded an STTR Phase I grant from the NIH. 


News Articles
[274 Associated News Articles listed on BioPortfolio]
Exciting New Data for Intralink-Spine’s Réjuve Treatment for Low Back Pain
Additional findings at the six-month juncture from its early safety and 
      feasibility study, Intralink-Spine, 
      Inc. (ILS) indicates that the Réjuve™ 
      System effectively elim...
A good night's sleep rests on your spine's biomechanics
A three-year study by QUT biomedical researchers in the Paediatric Spine Research Group (PSRG) aims to deepen our understanding of the concepts of comfort by using new techniques to look at how the sp...
PJK risk following lumbar spinal fusion depends on level of spine fused, study shows
The surgical correction of adult spinal deformities often involves realigning the lower portion of the spine, or the 'lumbar' spine.
Spine Surgeries Moving to Outpatient Facilities with 23-hour Observation
Spine surgery trends show that a greater proportion of spine surgeries are moving to an outpatient hospital setting, but fewer are moving to ASCs, according to a new study.
Low-dose CT of the whole spine found more sensitive than conventional radiographs in monitoring AS
MADRID — In patients with ankylosing spondylitis, low-dose CT of the whole spine delivered greater sensitivity than imaging with conventional radiographs, according to a study presented at the EULAR...
Titan Spine Appoints Spine Industry Expert As Vice President Of Professional Development
  Life Sciences Jobs                                                 ...
Risk Factors of Cervical Spine Instabilities in RA
A study explores the prognostic factors that may identify the risk of cervical spine instabilities among patients with rheumatoid arthritis.   Spine
VP of professional development named by Titan Spine
Ed Graubart, who has over 27 years of sales team infrastructure and personnel building experience in the spine field, has bee -More- 


Drugs and Medications
[43 Associated Drugs and Medications listed on BioPortfolio]
Letrozole [APP Pharmaceuticals, LLC]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use Letrozole Tablets, USP safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Letrozole Tablets, USP Letrozole Tablets, USPIniti...
Letrozole [Kremers Urban Pharmaceuticals Inc.]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use letrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for letrozole tablets. LETROZOLE Tablets, USPInitial U.S. A...
Letrozole [Qualitest Pharmaceuticals]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use Letrozole Tablets, USP safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Letrozole Tablets, USP. Letrozole Tablets, USPInit...
Anastrozole [Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Limited ]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use anastrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Anastrozole Tablets. Anastrozole tablet for oral useI...
Anastrozole [Breckenridge Pharmaceutical, Inc.]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use anastrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for anastrozole tablets. Initial U.S. ApprovalAnastrozole...


PubMed Articles
[945 Associated PubMed Articles listed on BioPortfolio]
Expert's comment concerning Grand Rounds case entitled "Thoracic osteotomy for Gorham-Stout disease of the spine: a case report and literature review" by C. Maillot et al., Eur Spine J: doi 10.1007/s00586-014-3613-3.

The Michel Benoist and Robert Mulholland yearly European Spine Journal Review: a survey of the "surgical and research" articles in the European Spine Journal, 2016.

Is Intraoperative Local Vancomycin Powder the Answer to Surgical Site Infections in Spine Surgery?
This is a retrospective cohort comparative study of all patients who underwent instrumented spine surgery at a single institution.
Letter to the Editor concerning "Association between IGF1 gene single nucleotide polymorphism (rs5742612) and adolescent idiopathic scoliosis: a meta-analysis" by M. Guan et al. (Eur Spine J; 2016. doi:10.1007/s00586-016-4742-7).

Answer to the Letter to the Editor of F. Sanchez-Mariscal et al. concerning "Risk of revision surgery for adult idiopathic scoliosis: a survival analysis of 517 cases over 25 years" by G. Riouallon et al. (Eur Spine J; 2016;25(8):2527-2534).



Clinical Trials
[528 Associated Clinical Trials listed on BioPortfolio]
Evaluation of Spine Surgery Analgesic Pathway
Investigators plan to study the role of spine surgery analgesic pathways - for procedures
      with high risk of postoperative pain - in improving the quality of recovery
Observational Clinical Study to Plan, Position and Check Instrument Placement for Spine Surgery.
There is a clear need in spine surgery to place pedicle screws in the right place in the
      spine with good accuracy to avoid damage to important structures (spinal cord, nerve roots
      or verte...
Single Versus Multifraction Salvage Spine Stereotactic Radiosurgery for Previously Irradiated Spinal Metastases
The goal of this clinical research study is to learn whether delivering spine radiosurgery
      in a single large dose is better than delivering spine radiosurgery over 3 smaller doses.

      Resear...
Thermal Ablation and Stereotactic Spine Radiosurgery (SSRS)
The goal of this clinical research study is to find out if combining thermal ablation (using
      a laser to heat tumor tissue in order to shrink the tumor size) and spine stereotactic
      radiosur...
Understanding Non-Response in Spine Fusion Surgery
To identify patient characteristics associated with non-response after spine fusion surgery
      for the treatment of degenerative disc disease (DDD).


Companies
[191 Associated Companies listed on BioPortfolio]
Intralink-Spine Inc.
Intralink-Spine Inc. (ILS) is privately held by Orthopeutics LP (OLP, Georgetown, TX) and a group of angel investors.  OLP is a biotechnology innovator founded in September of 2004 to develop and comm...
Intralink-Spine, Inc.

X-spine Systems, Inc.
X-spine (www.x-spine.com) 
      is a global developer and manufacturer of novel technologies for the 
      treatment of spinal disease. Based in Ohio, privately-held X-spine 
      markets sp...
Precision Spine, Inc.
Precision Spine, Inc. is a privately held company with its executive 
      headquarters in Parsippany, NJ. Precision Spine is the parent company of 
      its wholly owned subsidiaries, Spinal...
Precision Spine Inc.
Precision Spine, Inc., is a privately held company headquartered in 
      Parsippany, New Jersey, with manufacturing facilities in Pearl, 
      Mississippi. Precision Spine is dedicated to pr...

More Information about "Intralink-Spine Inc." on BioPortfolio
We have published hundreds of Intralink-Spine Inc. news stories on BioPortfolio along with dozens of Intralink-Spine Inc. Clinical Trials and PubMed Articles about Intralink-Spine Inc. for you to read. In addition to the medical data, news and clinical trials, BioPortfolio also has a large collection of Intralink-Spine Inc. Companies in our database. You can also find out about relevant Intralink-Spine Inc. Drugs and Medications on this site too.





Quick LinksAdvanced Search |
					Login |
					Subscribe | 
					RSS 

Quick Search






Advertisement


 

Relevant Topics
Biotechnology
Antibodies
 
  Antisense
 
  Assays
 
  Biochips
 
  Bioinformatics
 
  Biological Therapy
 
  Biomarkers
 
  Biomaterials
 
  Bioscience
 
  Cell Culture
 
  Cloning
 
  Cytokine
 
  Diagnostics
 
  Dna Extraction
 
  Dna Sequencing
 
  Dna Transform...
Collaborations in biotechnology
Commercial and academic collaborations are used throughout the biotechnology and pharmaceutical sector to enhance research and product development.

 Collaborations can take the form of research and evaluation agreements, licensing, partnerships etc.

 
...




Corporate Database Quicklinks
Search Corporate Database
Latest Corporate Records
Biotech Companies by Location
Popular Company Records
Recent Company Searches
Add or Control Your Corporate Profile


Searches Linking to this Company Record


















BioPortfolio Limited

About Us
Contact Us

Social Media

Twitter (200+ Accounts)
Twitter 
Google+ 
LinkedIn 



Publish Content

Publish
Publish Your Press Release
Advertise

Agreements

Agreements
Medical Disclaimer
Privacy



Tools

MyBioPortfolio
RSS

Help

FAQs
Sitemaps
XML Sitemap







			This site complies with the
			HONcode standard for trustworthy health
			information:
Verify here.



		The information provided by BioPortfolio.com is not a substitute for
		professional medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. The BioPortfolio
		site is sponsored BioPortfolio Limited with offices at Stafford House,
		10 Prince of Wales Road, Dorchester, DT1 1PW, England. If you
		are a legal copyright holder or a designated agent for such and you believe a
		post on this website falls outside the boundaries of “Fair Use” and
		legitimately infringes on your or your client's copyright we may be contacted
		concerning copyright matters at: priority@bioportfolio.com.
		
		All rights reserved. All other trademarks recognized. Copyright
		© 1997-2017 BioPortfolio Limited. Site developed by
		Alacrify Ltd.
	


















Low back pain sufferers experience relief with new treatment















































Home



Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes



August 29, 2016



Low back pain sufferers experience relief with new treatment

                      August 29, 2016 
                      by Whitney Harder
                      
                  















        Credit: University of Kentucky
    Millions of Americans suffering from low back pain could soon have a quick, cost-effective and permanent solution for the debilitating ailment. The solution, an injectable liquid called Réjuve, was pioneered by University of Kentucky researcher Tom Hedman and has received promising early results from a recent clinical study.
                                





 Réjuve, a product of Intralink-Spine Inc. and the focus of Hedman's research at UK, is an injectable orthopaedic device that mechanically strengthens the spinal disc and stabilizes the spinal joint. A key to Réjuve's effectiveness is the device's ability to promote crosslinking of fibrous proteins including collagen, which rejuvenates the spinal disk area.
According to an Intralink-Spine news release, one patient reported that he played 18 holes of golf three days after the Réjuve procedure and another climbed the Sydney Harbor Bridge a few days post procedure.
"This treatment addresses the core deficiencies that contribute to low back pain, rather than just temporarily masking the pain like existing approaches," said Hedman, who is an adjunct associate professor in the F. Joseph Halcomb III M.D. Department of Biomedical Engineering and chief scientific officer at Intralink-Spine. "Secondly, the benefit is almost immediate. Within days these patients are returning to work and strenuous activities with a dramatic reduction in pain."
Hedman also said both the cost of Réjuve and the 15-20-minute image-guided delivery procedure are considerably less than current and emerging treatments. 
"This is obviously extremely important as we see health care costs exploding in this country and abroad," he said.
The company is hopeful that patients will experience permanent low back pain relief with just one or two Réjuve injections. Currently, many low back pain sufferers receive numerous epidural steroid injections each year.
Hedman joined the UK faculty in 2010 and brought Intralink-Spine to UK's Coldstream Research Campus. He credits biomedical engineering faculty for providing collegial support and advice as Intralink-Spine has translated technology from the lab to the clinic. Additionally, the UK College of Engineering and College of Medicine, the National Institutes of Health and the Commonwealth of Kentucky provided a portion of the financial support needed to complete the preclinical testing of Réjuve. 
"The excitement of seeing technology that you've tested and developed for over 18 years, at long last, reach the clinical stage of testing is indescribable," Hedman said. "Health sciences researchers like myself choose this profession with the desire to see our life's work benefit others. It's still very early, but every one of our patients thus far are happy with the results of the treatment."
Hedman and the company are now planning a larger multisite clinical study. 
                                                                

Explore further:
Are antibiotics effective for low back pain?
 










Tweet








Favorites





                                                Email
                                            




                                                Print
                                            




                                                PDF
                                            


















Featured
Last comments
Popular











Brain cells found to control aging

Jul 26, 2017
                                 4
                        









People who drink 3 to 4 times per week less likely to develop diabetes than those who never drink: study

Jul 27, 2017
                                 0
                        









Cellular roots of anxiety identified

Jul 26, 2017
                                 0
                        









Infants know what we like best, study finds

Jul 27, 2017
                                 1
                        









Sugar not so sweet for mental health

Jul 27, 2017
                                 4
                        




more »







Medical Xpress on facebook



























Related Stories





Are antibiotics effective for low back pain?

 February 24, 2016
        


                    It is estimated that four in five Australians will experience low back pain during their lifetime. Treatment options are limited, and low back pain remains the leading cause of disability worldwide.
                



Spinal cord stimulation is a safe, effective drug-free treatment for chronic pain

 July 14, 2016
        


                    Chronic pain affects up to 20% of people in developed countries, and represents not only a profound impact on individuals and their families but also a sizeable burden on employers, health care systems, and society in general. ...
                






Steroid injections probably won't help your lower back pain

 August 25, 2015
        


                    (HealthDay)—Steroid injections for lower back pain may provide some relief for certain patients, but any benefits are temporary, a new study finds.
                






Back pain intensity most influential in fusion decision

 January 24, 2013
        


                    (HealthDay)—Patients seeing a spine surgeon are most influenced by low back pain intensity when considering whether to proceed with spinal fusion surgery, according to a study published in the Jan. 15 issue of Spine.
                



Vertebroplasty helps reduce acute pain among patients with spinal fractures

 August 19, 2016
        


                    Vertebroplasty is a safe and effective procedure to reduce acute pain and disability in patients who have experienced spinal fractures within a 6-week period, according to a new study published this week in The Lancet. In ...
                






Clinical trial shows stem cell injections reduce low pack pain (w/ Video)

 February 27, 2014
        


                    A single injection of stem cells into degenerative discs reduced low back pain for at least 12 months according to results of a 100-patient, phase II, international clinical trial that included researchers at the Emory Orthopaedics ...
                








Recommended for you





Researchers developing new tool to distinguish between viral, bacterial infections

 July 28, 2017
        


                    Antibiotics are lifesaving drugs, but overuse is leading to one of the world's most pressing health threats: antibiotic resistance. Researchers at the University of Rochester Medical Center are developing a tool to help physicians ...
                






Finish your antibiotics course? Maybe not, experts say

 July 27, 2017
        


                     British disease experts on Thursday suggested doing away with the "incorrect" advice to always finish a course of antibiotics, saying the approach was fuelling the spread of drug resistance.
                






Co-infection with two common gut pathogens worsens malnutrition in mice

 July 27, 2017
        


                    Two gut pathogens commonly found in malnourished children combine to worsen malnutrition and impair growth in laboratory mice, according to new research published in PLOS Pathogens.
                



Phase 3 trial confirms superiority of tocilizumab to steroids for giant cell arteritis

 July 26, 2017
        


                    A phase 3 clinical trial has confirmed that regular treatment with tocilizumab, an inhibitor of interleukin-6, successfully reduced both symptoms of and the need for high-dose steroid treatment for giant cell arteritis, the ...
                






A large-scale 'germ trap' solution for hospitals

 July 26, 2017
        


                    When an infectious airborne illness strikes, some hospitals use negative pressure rooms to isolate and treat patients. These rooms use ventilation controls to keep germ-filled air contained rather than letting it circulate ...
                






Researchers report new system to study chronic hepatitis B

 July 25, 2017
        


                    Scientists from Princeton University's Department of Molecular Biology have successfully tested a cell-culture system that will allow researchers to perform laboratory-based studies of long-term hepatitis B virus (HBV) infections. ...
                









                                    0 comments
                            












                        Please sign in to add a comment.
                        Registration is free, and takes less than a minute.
                        Read more












Click here to reset your password. 
                Sign in to get notified via email when new comments are made.
            













































Enter your Science X account credentials







 Remember me

Forget password?


Sign In



				    Sign in with your Facebook or Google+ account
				    







				    Not a member? Register



Profile
Newsletter
Favorites
Activity
PM
My news
Sign out
































Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes News








































                            Last update Hunger-controlling brain cells may offer path for new obesity drugs, 9 hours ago
                        









Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes news

sort by:
Date

6 hours
12 hours
1 day
3 days
all


Rank

Last day
1 week
1 month
all


LiveRank

Last day
1 week
1 month
all


Popular

Last day
1 week
1 month
all






Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Researchers developing new tool to distinguish between viral, bacterial infections
Antibiotics are lifesaving drugs, but overuse is leading to one of the world's most pressing health threats: antibiotic resistance. Researchers at the University of Rochester Medical Center are developing a tool to help physicians ...

            11 hours ago
            
55
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Retinyl propionate, climbazole improves photodamaged skin
(HealthDay)—Retinyl propionate and climbazole (RPC) is associated with clinical improvement in moderately photodamaged skin for women aged 40 to 70 years, according to a study published online July 22 in the International ...

            12 hours ago
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





From chronic to cured—could Australia be the first to eliminate hep C?
Australia is on track to eliminate hepatitis C by 2026, a new report released by the Kirby Institute on World Hepatitis Day shows.

            20 hours ago
            
4
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





World Hepatitis Day sets the stage for the elimination of viral hepatitis
Today, World Hepatitis Day, marks the first time that the global health community has come together to officially begin moving towards the elimination of viral hepatitis by 2030.

            22 hours ago
            
4
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Finish your antibiotics course? Maybe not, experts say
 British disease experts on Thursday suggested doing away with the "incorrect" advice to always finish a course of antibiotics, saying the approach was fuelling the spread of drug resistance.

            Jul 27, 2017
            
282
                 2












Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes
Immunology





Co-infection with two common gut pathogens worsens malnutrition in mice
Two gut pathogens commonly found in malnourished children combine to worsen malnutrition and impair growth in laboratory mice, according to new research published in PLOS Pathogens.

            Jul 27, 2017
            
1
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Can dogs teach doctors new tricks?
(HealthDay)—Can your canine companion help you fight off a troubling skin condition?

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





When is it nail fungus?
(HealthDay)—If you think you have nail fungus, you might be tempted to hide your problem with nail polish or self-treat with over-the-counter antifungal products. But you should visit a doctor instead, a dermatologist suggests.

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Memantine linked to lower neuron-specific enolase in TBI
(HealthDay)—For patients with moderate traumatic brain injury (TBI), memantine is associated with reduced neuronal damage, as assessed by serum levels of neuron-specific enolase (NSE), according to a study published online ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
1
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes
Immunology





MKTP surgery has long-term benefit for restoring skin pigmentation in vitiligo patients
A Henry Ford Hospital study has shown that skin transplant surgery has long-term benefit for restoring skin pigmentation caused by the skin disease vitiligo.

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Hunting-related pathogen exposure not just for adult males
Hunting and slaughtering wild animals in Western and Central Africa can put humans at risk of contracting zoonotic infections, including Ebola virus and Lassa virus. While previous studies have suggested that this risky hunting ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Myanmar seeks WHO help with deadly swine flu outbreak
Myanmar health authorities have asked the UN's health agency for help to combat a deadly outbreak of swine flu that has sparked alarm in the commercial capital.

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





EU report: More evidence on link between antibiotic use and antibiotic resistance
The European Food Safety Authority, the European Medicines Agency and the European Centre for Disease Prevention and Control are concerned about the impact of use of antibiotics on the increase in antibiotic-resistant bacteria. ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Should we be worried about hepatitis E?
Hepatitis E gets little press compared to its better-known cousins A, B and C, but Stellenbosch University virologists say we should wake up to how transmission of this virus is changing. World Hepatitis Day is commemorated ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Research highlights impact of kidney injury on non-renal solid organ transplants
Research led by a University of Cincinnati (UC) scientist shows the impact of acute kidney injury requiring dialysis (AKI-D) on patients receiving non-renal solid organ transplantation (NRSOT), including cardiac and liver ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Using latest technology, MRI provides 'one-stop-shop' to evaluate potential liver donors
Using the latest techniques, MRI can provide a "one-stop-shop" method for evaluation of potential living liver donors, according to an article published in the July 2017 issue of the American Journal of Roentgenology (AJR).

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Antibiotic guidelines in NICU improve prescription practices for vulnerable infants
Yale University School of Medicine neonatal intensive care unit (NICU) significantly reduced the number of cases of late-onset sepsis, a leading cause of death among pre-term infants, by implementing guidelines designed to ...

            Jul 27, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Phase 3 trial confirms superiority of tocilizumab to steroids for giant cell arteritis
A phase 3 clinical trial has confirmed that regular treatment with tocilizumab, an inhibitor of interleukin-6, successfully reduced both symptoms of and the need for high-dose steroid treatment for giant cell arteritis, the ...

            Jul 26, 2017
            
20
                 2







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





A large-scale 'germ trap' solution for hospitals
When an infectious airborne illness strikes, some hospitals use negative pressure rooms to isolate and treat patients. These rooms use ventilation controls to keep germ-filled air contained rather than letting it circulate ...

            Jul 26, 2017
            
61
                 1







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





UA mobile app tracks Zika virus for summer travelers
Just because Zika isn't in the news as much lately, doesn't mean the mosquito-borne infection no longer is a health threat. Researchers at the University of Arizona Mel and Enid Zuckerman College of Public Health and public ...

            Jul 26, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Around 9 million Europeans are affected by chronic hepatitis B or C
An estimated 4.7 million Europeans are living with chronic hepatitis B and almost 4 million (3.9) with chronic hepatitis C infection. However, large numbers of them are not even aware of their infection as they have not yet ...

            Jul 26, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


80% of Yemen children in need of immediate aid: UN
A vicious combination of war, cholera and hunger has left 80 percent of Yemeni children in desperate need of aid, the United Nations said on Wednesday.

            Jul 26, 2017
            
2
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Researchers report new system to study chronic hepatitis B
Scientists from Princeton University's Department of Molecular Biology have successfully tested a cell-culture system that will allow researchers to perform laboratory-based studies of long-term hepatitis B virus (HBV) infections. ...

            Jul 25, 2017
            
30
                 1







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Male hepatitis B patients suffer worse liver ailments, regardless of lifestyle
Why men with hepatitis B remain more than twice as likely to develop severe liver disease than women remains a mystery, even after a study led by a recent Drexel University graduate took lifestyle choices and environments ...

            Jul 25, 2017
            
25
                 0







Medications
Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Mind-body therapies immediately reduce unmanageable pain in hospital patients
Mindfulness training and hypnotic suggestion significantly reduced acute pain experienced by hospital patients, according to a new study published in the Journal of General Internal Medicine.

            Jul 25, 2017
            
157
                 1







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Global health lessons from Thailand's successful liver fluke elimination campaign
Outreach and education efforts can play an outsize role in disease elimination programs, researchers suggest in a review publishing July 25 in Trends in Parasitology. As a case study, they consider recent public health efforts ...

            Jul 25, 2017
            
190
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Experts aim to slash the number of deaths from killer fungal disease in Africa
Experts aim to halve the number of deaths from cryptococcal meningitis by changing drug treatment programmes after the results of a new medical trial.

            Jul 25, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


Novel class of antibiotics shows promise against plague, drug-resistant bacteria
Pathogenic bacteria are rapidly developing resistance to the arsenal of microbial therapies—and driving researchers to identify families of therapeutics with new modes of action. Recently, those include antibiotics that ...

            Jul 25, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes





Cryptococcal meningitis should be classified as a neglected tropical disease, researchers say
Crytococcal meningitis is a deadly invasive fungal infection which affects hundreds of thousands of HIV patients in the late stage of their disease every year.

            Jul 25, 2017
            
0
                 0







Diseases, Conditions, Syndromes


People living in rural households have lower risk of developing inflammatory bowel disease
Living in rural households decreases a person's risk of developing inflammatory bowel disease (IBD), particularly for young children and adolescents, according to a new study by researchers at the Children's Hospital of Eastern ...

            Jul 25, 2017
            
0
                 0





load more





Featured
Last comments
Most popular
Most shared





Laser used to reawaken lost memories in mice with Alzheimer's disease

Jul 26, 2017
                                    





Visual clues we use during walking and when we use them

Jul 25, 2017
                                    





Study suggests same gut bacteria can trigger different immune responses depending on environment

Jul 24, 2017
                                    





Experiments suggest body ownership causes weakening of self-generated tactile sensations

Jul 18, 2017
                                    





Researchers discover region of male mice brain involved in asserting dominance

Jul 14, 2017
                                    




more »






More News Stories


Hunger-controlling brain cells may offer path for new obesity drugs
Is the solution to the obesity epidemic all in our heads? A study by researchers at The Rockefeller University suggests that it might be.









Faster-acting antidepressants may finally be within reach
Some activity patterns in the brain can be dangerous, producing persistent dark moods that drain people's motivation, pleasure, and hope. For the past thirty years, pills like Prozac or Zoloft—collectively known as selective ...









Newly discovered biomarkers may lead to promising diagnostic tool for Alzheimer's
Diagnosing Alzheimer's disease and determining a patient's prognosis is an inexact business, and that stands in the way of better personalized care and advances in treatment.













Artificial light from digital devices lessens sleep quality
There's no doubt we love our digital devices at all hours, including after the sun goes down. Who hasn't snuggled up with a smart phone, tablet or watched their flat screen TV from the comfort of bed? A new study by researchers ...









BACE-Inhibitor successfully tested in Alzheimer's animal model
The protein amyloid beta is believed to be the major cause of Alzheimer's disease. Substances that reduce the production of amyloid beta, such as BACE inhibitors, are therefore promising candidates for new drug treatments. ...









To pick a great gift, it's better to give AND receive
If it's the thought that makes a gift count, here's a thought that can make your gift count extra: Get a little something for yourself.









Is it Alzheimer's or another dementia form? Why doctors need to distinguish
Alzheimer's disease now affects an estimated 5.5 million Americans, and after decades of feverish work, researchers have so far failed to find a treatment that halts or reverses the inexorable loss of memory, function and ...









A new insight into Parkinson's disease protein
Abnormal clumps of certain proteins in the brain are a prominent feature of Parkinson's and other neurodegenerative diseases, but the role those same proteins might play in the normal brain has been unknown.




Immune cells may be key to better allergy, infection therapies
By learning how a recently discovered immune cell works in the body, researchers hope to one day harness the cells to better treat allergies and infections, according to new Cornell research.









Dulled taste may prompt more calories on path to obesity
Cornell University food scientists have found that people with a diminished ability to taste food choose sweeter - and likely higher-calorie - fare. This could put people on the path to gaining weight.









Scientists use new data mining strategy to spot those at high Alzheimer's risk
The push to develop treatments for Alzheimer's disease has been a promising and disappointing endeavor over the past two decades, yielding a greater understanding of the disease yet still failing to generate successful new ...









Study finds walnuts may promote health by changing gut bacteria
Research led by Lauri Byerley, PhD, RD, Research Associate Professor of Physiology at LSU Health New Orleans School of Medicine, has found that walnuts in the diet change the makeup of bacteria in the gut, which suggests ...









Cancer cells put the brakes on immune system
In order for cancer cells to successfully spread and multiply, they must find a way to avoid the body's own immune system. Scientists at the German Cancer Research Center have published an explanation for how this occurs ...









Green tea ingredient may ameliorate memory impairment, brain insulin resistance, and obesity
A study published online in The FASEB Journal, involving mice, suggests that EGCG (epigallocatechin-3-gallate), the most abundant catechin and biologically active component in green tea, could alleviate high-fat and high-fructose ...









New surgical strategy offers hope for repairing spinal injuries
Scientists in the UK and Sweden previously developed a new surgical technique to reconnect sensory neurons to the spinal cord after traumatic spinal injuries. Now, they have gained new insight into how the technique works ...









Manipulating a type of brain cell gets weight loss results in mice
A new study has found something remarkable: the activation of a particular type of immune cell in the brain can, on its own, lead to obesity in mice. This striking result provides the strongest demonstration yet that brain ...




Sponsored account




Did you know? You can become a Medical Xpress sponsor and enjoy all our 
                                content without ads! Simply donate any amount and not only will you experience
                                our site ad-free, but you will be part of the Science X community mission to promote science and technology knowledge. 
                            





Arizona aims to combat wrong-way driving with new technology






 Team manufactures magnets entirely from US-sourced rare earths






 In solar eclipse's 'path of totality,' rooms go for $1,000 and vendors sell every trinket under the sun




New NC island was expected to eventually disappear, but not like this






 Scientists find moon of Saturn has chemical that could form 'membranes'






 Computer models provide new understanding of sickle cell disease






 New light-activated catalyst grabs CO2 to make ingredients for fuel






 NASA's Aqua satellite finds a Tropical Cyclone sandwich






 Tropical Storm Irwin's eastern side builds on satellite imagery






 EPA OKs pollution controls on new diesel Jeeps, Ram pickups





More of today's stories




Screen time linked to diabetes

19 hours ago
                     





New insights into protein's role in inflammatory response

20 hours ago
                     







                                Find more news articles via sort by date page
                            
































Enter your Science X account credentials







 Remember me

Forget password?


Sign In



				    Sign in with your Facebook or Google+ account
				    







				    Not a member? Register



Profile
Newsletter
Favorites
Activity
PM
My news
Sign out






























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft




































Secure Virtual Data Rooms & Document Sharing by Intralinks






































	Intralinks is now part of Synchronoss. Learn more >




 













Menu



Close subnavigation


























Securing Business Beyond Boundaries
Securely share and collaborate on high-value content across teams, partners, customers, counterparties and regulators





 











Manage the M&A Deal Lifecycle









Transform Drug Development with Cloud Technologies 









Simplify Bank Regulatory Compliance









Externalize SharePoint and Other ECM Systems









Learn about Intralinks’ Content Collaboration Network 









Intralinks Trust Perimeter









One secure enterprise platform for simple file sync & share, collaborative team workspaces, large-scale virtual data rooms and structured workflows






Collaborate with Anyone, Anytime, Anywhere


              Highly configurable workspaces, with 24/7 user support, native Microsoft/Adobe experience and mobile file access          






Protect Your Information with On-Demand Security


              Granular access controls, plugin-free Information Rights Management, customer-managed encryption keys and detailed reporting.           






Streamline Cross-Boundary Digital Processes


              Deploy custom solutions or leverage pre-configured industry best practice workflows, tasking, content templates, reports and services.          






Connect to a Global Network


              Integrate enterprise applications and information to enable purposeful collaboration across boundaries.          






    SCHEDULE A DEMO  




    SET UP A VIRTUAL DATA ROOM  











              Experience supporting the most demanding and IP-Intensive industries          




              Worth of strategic initiatives and capital market transactions          




              Customer-led audits of Intralinks data centers, source code, processes and personnel           




              Of Global Fortune 1000 have used Intralinks          




Trusted by leading global enterprises, including:

 

 

 

 

 



More customers

Our Awards







            Ranked #1 by Gartner for Collaboration and Social Software Ten Years Straight          








            Awarded Best Global M&A Platform by Acquisition International          








            Leader in KuppingerCole Leadership Compass for Secure Information Sharing          








            Leader in Forrester Wave for Enterprise File Sync and Share          












 

"Intralinks Deal Flow Predictor" Get a six-month preview of global M&A activity.
See the new report >






 

Intralinks and Cass Business School analyze what happens if you leak a deal before its public announcement. 
Read the research >






 

Forrester names Intralinks leading vendor in Enterprise File Sync & Share market
See the report >






Our Blog


 


 

Which Countries Leak the Most M&A Deals and Why?

19 Jul 2017






 

GDPR Dominates Infosecurity UK

18 Jul 2017






 

Syndicated Scoop: Global H1 2017 Loans Review, Amazon $13.7bn Bridge Loan, and More

17 Jul 2017






 

What Exactly Does “Enterprise-Grade” Mean?

10 Jul 2017



 
 




News & Press



26 Jun 2017

Bankers Are Hiring Cyber-Security Experts to Help Get Deals Done 
 


22 Jun 2017

Leaking Information on M&A Deals Boosts Deal Values by An Average US$21m 
 


11 May 2017

Synchronoss Becomes Microsoft Gold-Certified Partner and Improves Collaboration for The Extended Enterprise with Expanded Microsoft Office 365 Integration 
 
 
 



Events



10 Aug 2017

Vietnam M&A Forum 2017   
          Vietnam    
 


20 Sep 2017

8th CFO Innovation Forum Hong Kong  
          Hong Kong    
 


21 Sep 2017

Intralinks Insights Briefing: 2017 LP Survey 
          New York, NY    
 
 











Chat With Sales














X

COOKIES
The cookies which we use on this site record information about your online preferences, remember information about you when you visit our site and compile statistical reports on website activity. Some of the cookies we use are essential in order for us to provide our services and the website to you.
By clicking 'Close and Continue' or by continuing to use our site you are consenting to our use of cookies in accordance with our cookies policy.


Close and continue
Find out more
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



































Log in to Intralinks | Intralinks






































	Intralinks is now part of Synchronoss. Learn more >




 













Menu



Close subnavigation


























 



    Log in to Intralinks  









			Select your product edition to log in:
		







					Intralinks Virtual Data Room®
				

					Includes Dealspace
				

Log in




					Intralinks VIA® Pro
				

Log in




					Intralinks VIA® Elite
				

					Includes Fundspace, Studyspace and Connect
				

Log in




	 




			Are you using a specialized module?
		






				Intralinks Dealnexus®
			

Log in




				Intralinks Dealmanager®
			

Log in




				Intralinks Debtspace®
			

Log in




				Intralinks Courier®
			

Log in



	 




			Need help logging into Intralinks?
		


Contact Support 



	 

 








		Not a customer?
	

		Learn about our platform and solutions
	

Explore Solutions 




 







Chat With Sales














X

COOKIES
The cookies which we use on this site record information about your online preferences, remember information about you when you visit our site and compile statistical reports on website activity. Some of the cookies we use are essential in order for us to provide our services and the website to you.
By clicking 'Close and Continue' or by continuing to use our site you are consenting to our use of cookies in accordance with our cookies policy.


Close and continue
Find out more
















Intralink-Spine  | Coldstream
























































 











 







 
 


AboutAbout ColdstreamColdstream Quick FactsLocate to LexingtonNews & EventsSuccess StoriesUniversity of KentuckyCompaniesCompany DirectoryDevelopersDevelopment OpportunitiesSite AttributesSite PlanProspective TenantsAmenities and RecreationAvailable FacilitiesColdstream ResourcesLocate to ColdstreamUK ResourcesContactColdstream ExecutivesDirections 
 




WHERE BUSINESS & RESEARCH CONNECT




 


 
 



Home » Companies » Intralink-Spine 
Intralink-Spine 




          Submitted by kjpowe2 on Thu, 04/19/2012        



Intralink-Spine Inc. (ILS) is a company formed to develop, manufacture, and sell a proprietary, tissue revitalization reagent that can be injected into the spinal disc to mechanically reinforce and stabilize the joint and decompress the surrounding neural tissues without the need for invasive spinal surgery.

	 

	 

	Contact: Tom Hedman

	Phone: 512-818-8468

	Email: thedman@intralink-spine.com

	Address: 1501 Bull Lea Road, Suite 103

	Website: www.intralink-spine.com

	 

   
 
 
 








 



	Coldstream Research Campus
	1500 Bull Lea Road, Ste. 100 | Lexington, KY 40511
	
		 
Phone: 859.231.8324
Email: coldstream@uky.edu


 
 


 
 
 






	Exciting New Data For Intralink Spines Réjuve Treatment For Low Back Pain













































Employer:
Login
Post Jobs


Job Seeker:
Login
Sign Up

























Search Life Sciences Jobs





Search Job Title Only












Radius:
Miles



Km80.5
















                 News | News By Subject | News by Disease |  
    News By Date | Search News



















Get Our FREEIndustry eNewsletter

email:


*
            
*
            



















 

 






Exciting New Data For Intralink Spine’s Réjuve Treatment For Low Back Pain  











Tweet








5/16/2017 10:26:19 AM




  Life Sciences Jobs
 


  &bullet; Newest Jobs - Last 24 Hours


  &bullet; California Jobs


  &bullet; Massachusetts Jobs


  &bullet; New Jersey Jobs


  &bullet; Maryland Jobs


  &bullet; Washington Jobs


  View More Jobs


LEXINGTON, Ky.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Additional findings at the six-month juncture from its early safety and 
      feasibility study, Intralink-Spine, 
      Inc. (ILS) indicates that the Réjuve™ 
      System effectively eliminates or reduces low back pain.
    

      “We’ve demonstrated the safety of this device, and it has performed as 
      expected. The dramatic pain reduction in these patients correlated with 
      some objective measures: there was an average increase in lumbar range 
      of motion of 9 degrees and there was a statistically significant 25% 
      increase in treated level lordosis, based on kinematic data analysis 
      performed by Medical Metrics Inc. Decreased lumbar lordosis is known to 
      be related to disc degeneration and back pain, especially when 
      standing,” states Dr. Tom 
      Hedman, Ph.D., the inventor and Adjunct Associate Professor in the F. 
      Joseph Halcomb III, M.D. Department of Biomedical Engineering at the 
      University of Kentucky.
    

      “I was also excited to see that the only symptomatic disc in these first 
      few low back pain patients that was shown to be clinically unstable 
      pre-treatment (QSI = 2.5, meaning the instability as quantified by 
      translation per degree of rotation (TPDR) was 2.5 standard deviations 
      above the mean for an asymptomatic, radiographically normal population) 
      was effectively stabilized by the Réjuve treatment. This previously 
      symptomatic and unstable segment was asymptomatic (no pain and no 
      disability at 1 month through 6 months) and stable with a normal TPDR 
      (QSI = -0.1). This result illustrates and affirms one of the mechanisms 
      for pain relief associated with this product,” says Dr. Hedman.
    

      “After a six-month period, 80% of patients had excellent results (pain 
      and disability reduced >50%). Patient data are also showing the Réjuve 
      Treatment is “fast acting” – treatment effects seen at 2-weeks 
      post-procedure continued or improved through 6-months in 80% of patients 
      treated. Think of it, the positive effects of Réjuve are both rapid and 
      long-lasting,” says Lyle 
      Hawkins, CEO of Intralink-Spine, Inc. “Low back pain (LBP) is a 
      challenging condition to treat, which is why we’re excited about our 
      data thus far and another reason we’re excited about our studies 
      underway in Malaysia and Canada.”
    

      About Intralink Spine, Inc.(ILS): formed to manufacture and exclusively 
      sell the Réjuve™ injectable medical device to treat Degenerative Disc 
      Disease (DDD), low back pain, and related spinal diseases such as 
      scoliosis. ILS is currently conducting a Round C for qualified investors.
    
 
      Intralink-Spine Inc.Lyle Hawkins, 502-419-8099LHawkins@IntralinkSpine.com







                Read at
                BioSpace.com







Related News
Intralink Spine’s Réjuve Treatment Nears Completion Of Safety Study And Begins Multi-Site Pivotal Study  The FDA Spurns Reports FOX News is the Only Show Allowed at HQ  Intralink Spine’s Réjuve Treatment Eliminates Low Back Pain  Google (GOOG)'s Verily Loses High-Profile Scientist  Intralink Spine Continues To See Positive Clinical Results For The Treatment Of Low Back Pain  3 Biotech Leaders Of Personalized Medicine Right Now  Intralink Spine, Excited About Early Patient Feedback Regarding Its Treatment For Low Back Pain  This Bay Area Biotech Snags $293 Million Pain Drug Pact With Novartis AG (NVS)  Faster FDA Approvals? Not So Fast: 1 Out of 3 New Drugs Had Safety Problems No One Knew About  Turmoil Hits As TherapeuticsMD (TXMD)'s Vaginal Pain Drug Gets Rejected By The FDA 




Please enable JavaScript to view the comments powered by Disqus.
comments powered by Disqus






















                            •
                            BioSpace.com










                            •
                            Intralink Spine




             
        





                            •
                            Medical Devices



                            •
                            Medical Dev. & Diag. - Research




             
        





                            • 
                                            Pain control
















                              
                            

                              
                             
                              
                            

                              
                            








                 












































Stuccu: Best Deals on . Up To 70% off!
















Toys


                                        ﻿







            ALL TOYS CATEGORIES
        





                                Electronics for Kids
                            





                                LEGO
                            





                                Star Wars
                            







                                Board Games & Puzzles
                            





                                Stuffed Animals & Plush Toys
                            





                                Dolls & Accessories
                            





                                Learning & Education
                            










                            THE TECH GENERATION
                            












                            CUDDLY AND SOFT
                            












                            PLAY AND LEARN
                            












Electronics


                                        ﻿







            ALL ELECTRONICS CATEGORIES
        





                                TV & Video
                            





                                Home Audio & Theater
                            





                                Camera, Photo & Video
                            





                                Cell Phones & Accessories
                            





                                Headphones
                            





                                Video Games
                            





                                Bluetooth & Wireless Speakers
                            







                                Car Electronics
                            





                                Electronics Accessories
                            





                                Wearable Technology
                            





                                Laptops & Tablets
                            





                                Desktops & Monitors
                            





                                Computer Accessories & Peripherals
                            





                                Computer Parts & Components
                            





                                Printers & Ink
                            










                            CAPTURE THE MOMENT
                            












                            SIT BACK AND RELAX
                            












                            GET TECH SAVVY
                            












Books


                                        ﻿







            ALL BOOKS CATEGORIES
        





                                Literature & Fiction
                            





                                Sci-Fi & Fantasy
                            





                                Mystery & Suspense
                            





                                Biographies & Memoirs
                            





                                Arts & Photography
                            





                                Children's Books
                            





                                Food and Drink
                            







                                History
                            





                                Romance
                            





                                Teens & Young
                            





                                Travel & Holiday Guides
                            





                                Graphic Novels, Anime & Manga
                            





                                Dictionaries & Languages
                            





                                Audio Books
                            





                                eBook Readers
                            










                            BE THAT BOOKWORM
                            












                            ENTER A NEW WORLD
                            












                            BEST SELLERS
                            












Musical Instruments


                                        ﻿







            ALL MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS CATEGORIES
        





                                Guitars
                            





                                Keyboards
                            





                                Drums
                            





                                DJ & Karaoke
                            







                                Recording
                            





                                Live Sound
                            





                                Band & Orchestra
                            





                                Accessories
                            










                            GROOVY GUITARS
                            












                            MIX IT UP
                            












                            DRUM AWAY
                            












Women's Apparel


                                        ﻿







            ALL WOMEN'S APPAREL CATEGORIES
        





                                Blouses, Tops & Tees
                            





                                Hoodies, Cardigans & Sweatshirts
                            





                                Jeans & Leggings
                            





                                Skirts & Dresses
                            





                                Bags
                            







                                Activewear
                            





                                Swimsuits & Cover Ups
                            





                                Lingerie, Sleep & Lounge
                            





                                Coats, Jackets & Vests
                            





                                Accessories
                            










                            ALL IMPORTANT ACCESSORIES
                            












                            CREATE YOUR STYLE
                            












                            FASHION IS YOU
                            












Men's Apparel


                                        ﻿







            ALL MEN'S APPAREL CATEGORIES
        





                                T-shirts & Tops
                            





                                Cardigans & Sweatshirts
                            





                                Jeans & Pants
                            





                                Dresswear
                            





                                Bags & Wallets
                            







                                Activewear
                            





                                Swimsuits
                            





                                Sleepwear & Underwear
                            





                                Coats, Jackets & Vests
                            





                                Accessories
                            










                            DAPPER DUDES
                            












                            THROW IT IN THE BAG
                            












                            NEVER SHY OF SHOES
                            












Children's Apparel


                                        ﻿







            ALL CHILDREN'S APPAREL CATEGORIES
        





                                T-shirts & Tops
                            





                                Cardigans & Sweatshirts
                            





                                Jeans & Pants
                            







                                Dresswear
                            





                                Sleepwear
                            





                                Coats, Jackets & Vests
                            





                                Accessories
                            










                            SWEET AND STYLISH
                            












                            RUNNING WILD
                            












                            WARM AND SNUG
                            












Home


                                        ﻿







            ALL HOME CATEGORIES
        





                                Kitchen
                            





                                Furniture & Decor
                            





                                Garden
                            







                                Home Improvement
                            





                                Bedroom & Bathroom
                            





                                Lighting
                            





                                Appliances
                            










                            DREAMS CAN COME TRUE
                            












                            TURN DOWN THE LIGHTS
                            












                            FURNITURE FOR THE FAMILY
                            












Sports


                                        ﻿







            ALL SPORTS CATEGORIES
        





                                Clothing
                            





                                Exercise Equipment
                            





                                Hunting & Fishing
                            





                                Team Sports
                            





                                Golf
                            







                                Cycling
                            





                                Water Sports
                            





                                Winter Sports
                            





                                Climbing Accessories
                            





                                Camping & Hiking
                            










                            BE A CHAMPION
                            












                            FEEL INVINCIBLE
                            












                            ADVENTURE AWAITS
                            












Health and Beauty


                                        ﻿







            ALL HEALTH AND BEAUTY CATEGORIES
        





                                For Her
                            





                                For Him
                            





                                Fragrance
                            







                                Make Up
                            





                                Nails
                            





                                Everyday Essentials
                            





                                Hair Removal
                            










                            FIND YOUR SCENT
                            












                            KEEPING YOU HEALTHY
                            












                            MALE GROOMING
                            












Automotive


                                        ﻿







            ALL AUTOMOTIVE CATEGORIES
        





                                Car Care
                            





                                Exterior Accessories
                            





                                Interior Accessories
                            







                                Light & Lighting Accessories
                            





                                Performance Parts & Accessories
                            





                                Replacement Parts
                            





                                Wheels & Tires
                            










                            COMFORT AT ITS BEST
                            












                            SMOOTH DRIVING
                            












                            CAR CARE
                            












Baby Products


                                        ﻿







            ALL BABY PRODUCTS CATEGORIES
        





                                Nursery
                            





                                Clothing
                            





                                Gifts and Toys
                            







                                Strollers
                            





                                Bath
                            





                                Car Seats
                            





                                Travel
                            










                            LOOKING AFTER HEALTH
                            












                            SAFE AND SOUND
                            












                            SPOILED FOR CHOICE!
                            





















Suggestions






                Find deals from over 1000 stores, including:
            























                    Explore
                






                        Products
                    











                        Articles
                    








Everything you love, in one place.
The best products from around the web.
Read all about it!!



﻿








                    Articles
                


                10 Easy Ways to Save Money on Back to School Supplies
            

Back to School
School Supplies



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Tablets for Kids
            

Technology



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                16 College Dorm Products You'll Need to Survive
            

Decorating
College
Bedroom



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Leaper School Bags
            

Backpacks
School



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                13 Quirky Products to Bring Summer to the Office
            

summer
office supplies
school supplies



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Staedtler Pen Sets
            

School Supplies



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Best Smartphones to Buy in 2016
            

smartphone
tech
samsung



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Rio Havaianas
            

Olympics 2016
Rio



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Finding the Best Bike for You
            

bike
fitness
health



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Dry Erase Removable Wall Calendar
            

Dorm Room
Classroom



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                What Every Traveler Needs
            

travel
packing guide
bags



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Epson Printers
            

Printer
Tech



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Whatever Floats your Boat
            

summer
pool floats
outdoors



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Leakproof Lunch Boxes
            

Kitchen
Snacks



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Beach Day Accessories you won't be able to Resist
            

Beach day
summer



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Play Doh 
            

Sensory play
Pre-school



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Marathon Running: The Basic Gear Guide
            

running
health and fitness
marathon



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Rio Olympics Plush Toy Mascots
            

Olympics
Toys
Mascot



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                Why I'm Obsessed with Smarthome Tech
            

smarttech
energy efficiency



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Spiral Notebooks
            

Notebooks
School



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                The Practical Gift Guide for Babies
            

baby
presents
newborn



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Epson Label Makers
            

Label
Order



                    Buy now
                



﻿








                    Articles
                


                eBook Readers for the Book Worm on Vacation
            

kindle
glowlight
kobo aura



                    Read more
                



﻿








                    Products
                


                Playground Ball Sets
            

Playground Games



                    Buy now
                



 







































Stuccu: Best Deals on . Up To 70% off!
















            Bringing you the best deals from 
            the stores that you know and love
        



What is Stuccu?

                Stuccu is a website that works together with different sellers so you can buy products at low prices. 
                Our vision is to make Stuccu your first and only stop when it comes to online shopping. 
            

                And if we can make it fun for you, all the better.
            






                    What can we do for you?
                

                    We will search the web and bring you the best offers
                    from major online retailers.
                









                *
            
                Using Stuccu will save you both money and time as you no
                longer need to search through dozens of websites.
                Instead, everything is in one place: Stuccu.

            



*

                We will then direct you to the product pages on the sellers' websites where you can finalize the purchase.
                It's as easy as 1-2-3!
            









                    Any questions?
                

                    If you have any questions, make sure to visit our FAQ page.
                    You can also contact us through the Contact Us 
form on the same page.
                






                If you love us and want to say hi, be sure to follow us on these social networks.
            












32 Camden Lock Place, London, NW1 8AL UK
            




































Stuccu: Best Deals on . Up To 70% off!









    ﻿



Trending Deals going fast 







                        All Trending Deals
                    



                            ﻿






Premium Real Screen Protector Tempered Glass Film For iPhone 6 6s 7 Plus

Free Shipping                
$0.99






                            ﻿






Adidas NEW Mens Original Crewneck Graphic Tee Trefoil T-Shirt $30

Free Shipping                
$13.99






                            ﻿






Windows 10 Professional Pro 32/64 Bits Authentic Product Key License

Free Shipping                
$4.99






                            ﻿






Emoji Charm Bracelet - 18K Yellow Gold Plated Beads - 10 Charms

Free Shipping                
$14.99






                            ﻿






NEW Universal Phone Holder Expanding Stand Grip Pop Mount Pop For Phone Tablets

Free Shipping                
$1.30






                            ﻿






Hanes 5 Pack Men's Underwear TAGLESS Boxer Briefs with Comfort Flex Waistband

Free Shipping                
$13.70






                            ﻿






New OEM Apple Earphones for iPhone 6 6S 5 SE 4S w/Remote & Mic, happy costumers!

Free Shipping                
$6.94






                            ﻿






10000Lumens XM-L T6 Zoomable Tactical military LED 18650 Flashlight Torch Lamp

Free Shipping                
$4.98






                            ﻿






Privacy Anti-Spy Real Tempered Glass Screen Protector Shield for 4.7" iPhone 7

Free Shipping                
$3.89






                            ﻿




15 left




 iTunes Codes - $25 $50 or $100 - Fast Email Delivery 

Free Shipping                
$25.00






                            ﻿






Premium Real Screen Protector Tempered Glass For iPhone 6 6s 7 Plus

Free Shipping                
$0.99






                            ﻿






LCD Display Touch Screen Digitizer Assembly Replacement for Iphone 6 6S 7 Plus

Free Shipping                
$19.95






                            ﻿






MagicGuardz® Premium Tempered Glass Screen Protector for Apple iPhone 7 Plus

Free Shipping                
$3.49






                            ﻿






Dyson SV04 V6 Absolute Cordless Vacuum | Fuchsia | Refurbished

Free Shipping                
$220.00






                            ﻿






GoPro Hero Session Refurbished

Free Shipping                
$99.99






                            ﻿






Crocs Mens Santa Cruz 2 Luxe Loafer

Free Shipping                
$24.99






                            ﻿






Genuine Original Apple iPhone 7 6s 6 Plus 5 USB Lightning Charger Data Cable OEM

Free Shipping                
$4.99






                            ﻿




23 left




7x9 Natural Black Onyx Oval cabochon loose gemstone calibrated  lot of 10 pcs 

Free Shipping                
$12.99






                            ﻿






For iPhone ALL MODELS Luxury Ultra Thin Hybrid Slim Hard Case Cover

Free Shipping                
$5.90






                            ﻿






PUMA G. Vilas 2 Core Men's Sneakers

Free Shipping                
$39.99






                            ﻿






Premium Tempered Glass Clear Screen Protector for Samsung Galaxy S6

Free Shipping                
$2.69






                            ﻿






Fila Men's Memory Maranello 4 Running Shoe

Free Shipping                
$21.99






                            ﻿






Kickstand Card Pocket Hybrid Armor Silicone Cover Case For iPhone 6 6S 7 Plus

Free Shipping                
$5.92






                            ﻿






Premium Screen Protector Real Tempered Glass Film for iPhone SE 5 6s 7 Plus 

Free Shipping                
$1.95






                            ﻿






Why be Racist When You Could Just be Quiet Shirt Tumblr Outfit, T-shirt Human 


$7.95






                            ﻿






iPhone 7 / 7 Plus Case Cover Protective Hybrid Rugged Shockproof Rubber Hard 

Free Shipping                
$6.49






                            ﻿






New Premium Real Tempered Glass Screen Protector for Apple iPhone 7 Plus 

Free Shipping                
$3.95






                            ﻿




23 left




XBOX LIVE 14 DAY 2 WEEKS GOLD TRIAL MEMBERSHIP (XBOX ONE)

Free Shipping                
$4.09






                            ﻿






Bose QuietComfort 35 Wireless Headphones - Factory-Renewed

Free Shipping                
$259.95






                            ﻿






Super Deluxe 1800 Count Hotel Quality 4 Piece Deep Pocket Bed Sheet Set

Free Shipping                
$12.89






                            ﻿






The Boss Baby DVD 2017 Family, Animation, (Now Shipping) (Fast Free US Seller)

Free Shipping                
$7.50






                            ﻿






Apple iPhone 5S- 16 32 64GB GSM "Factory Unlocked" Smartphone Gold Gray Silver c

Free Shipping                
$119.95






                            ﻿






For Apple iPhone 7 Plus / 7 Ultra Thin Transparent Clear Shockproof Bumper Case

Free Shipping                
$5.99






                            ﻿






Ultra Thin Slim Hard Case Cover For Apple iPhone 6 6S 7 / Plus + Tempered Glass

Free Shipping                
$4.97






                            ﻿






Self-Adhesive Stick Push-Up Silicone Bra Gel Strapless Invisible Backless Nubra

Free Shipping                
$5.99






                            ﻿






Luxury Ultra-Thin Electroplate Hard Back Case Cover For Samsung Galaxy Phones

Free Shipping                
$6.96






                            ﻿






Jet Black 360° Full Cover Hybrid Hard Case For Iphone 6S 7 Plus+Tempered Glass

Free Shipping                
$4.99






                            ﻿






OEM Original Apple Lightning USB 2M 6ft Charger Cable for iPhone7 6S Plus 5S 5

Free Shipping                
$5.99






                            ﻿




24 left




Samsung EVO 32GB microSDHC micro SD SDHC UHS microSD for Galaxy S5 Class 10 Card

Free Shipping                
$4.99






                            ﻿




50 left




New Samsung Galaxy Note 5 SM-N920T 32GB Smartphone for T-Mobile

Free Shipping                
$259.99






                            ﻿






Dermacol High Cover Makeup Foundation Hypoallergenic Waterproof SPF 30

Free Shipping                
$7.99






                            ﻿






New OEM Apple Earphones for iPhone 6 5 4S w/Remote & Mic, happy costumers!

Free Shipping                
$6.95






                            ﻿






BORUiT 13000 Lumen Headlamp XM-L 3x T6 LED Headlight 18650 Battery Light Charger

Free Shipping                
$20.99






                            ﻿






US Women's BOHO Long Maxi Evening Cocktail Party Summer Beach Dress Sundress New

Free Shipping                
$1.69






                            ﻿




2 left




Savini Jason + Counselor Clothing DLC 1 - Xbox One - Read Description First!

Free Shipping                
$17.00


































Stuccu Diary - Stuccu Diary - for gift ideas, guides, and fun!




































  









Skip to content














Welcome to the Stuccu Diary 
Keep up to date with holidays, events, technology, home decor and DIYs!






17




Little Touches for your Home 






10




The Accessories to Top-off Your Style 






9




4 Irresistibly Cute Baby Gifts 






3




Budget Headphones For Music Buffs 






5




10 Gifts for Dessert Lovers 






5




Keeping it Cool in the Kitchen 






6




Gift Guide for Her 






3




Best Games for the Holiday Season 






1




Christmas Gift Guide for Him 






2




Top Toys to Buy for Christmas 2016 














 


Little Touches for your Home
7 months ago • 0 comments • Home & Garden • 



17


 

You move into a new house, you’re excited and happy, it’s everything you ever dreamed of. Then 2 years flash by and before you know it your beautiful house is no longer everything you wanted. Give it a breathe of fresh-air with these little touches. Rainfall High Pressure Shower Head Limescale builds over time and […]






 


The Accessories to Top-off Your Style
7 months ago • 0 comments • Fashion • 



10


 

Whether you are treating yourself, or looking to buy a gift for someone else, here are the accessories you should be looking at that will add an extra something to anyone’s outfit. ALOV Heart Necklace This beautiful and delicate sterling silver necklace comes with a 45cm long chain. The inscribed message reads: “I love you to […]






 


4 Irresistibly Cute Baby Gifts
7 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides • 



9


 

While expecting parents will want the best for their baby, they’ll also be very conscious of cost and are more likely to go for budget friendly options. Which is where baby gifts come in! A baby gift should be both usable, practical, and fun – something that the new family will really appreciate but wouldn’t […]






 


Budget Headphones For Music Buffs
8 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides, Technology • 



3


 

Headphones are a must for every music lover. They allow us to leave behind the often noisy world and lose ourselves in a world of sound and music of our liking. Sadly, the headphones that often get the spotlight generally cost well over a hundred dollars. Many are great, amazing even, but we know very […]






 


10 Gifts for Dessert Lovers
8 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides • 



5


 

These gifts are perfect for friends with a sweet tooth. We won’t judge if they’re for yourself 😉 1. Ice Cream Maker  Get an old fashioned ice cream maker so you can make your own ice cream, frozen yogurt, or gelato. It can make up to 4 quarts with no manual effort required. The outer […]






 


Keeping it Cool in the Kitchen
8 months ago • 0 comments • Home & Garden • 



5


 

The kitchen is often overlooked as a place to decorate in the home. While you may not be able to hang paintings on the walls, you can add some kitchen utensils that will accentuate your kitchen and be great conversation starters. Spartan Knife Holder         Made from high quality laminated birch wood.         Size: 6” wide x […]






 


Gift Guide for Her
8 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides • 



6


 

We all know the feeling. Excitement because you’re invited to a party but dread because now you’ll need to buy a gift. Gift buying is always a challenge unless you know the person really well. It is the cause of fruitless hours spent browsing through stores to find the perfect gift. If you’re clueless about […]






 


Best Games for the Holiday Season
8 months ago • 0 comments • Entertainment • 



3


 

Holiday season is all about spending quality time with the family. Problem is it may get a little boring after a while which is why when you see a lull in the conversation you whip out the games! Minions Pie Face Pie Face is back with a Minions version! Stick your head in the cutout, […]






 


Christmas Gift Guide for Him
9 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides, Holidays • 



1


 

It can be so hard to know what to get guys as gifts. Which is why we’ve researched it and come up with the Christmas gift guide for him – featuring trending gifts for guys this Christmas! Having to buy gifts for everyone can get expensive so if you’re tight on a budget or are […]






 


Top Toys to Buy for Christmas 2016
9 months ago • 0 comments • Gift Guides, Holidays • 



2


 

Christmas is coming and the hunt for gifts begins! If you’re looking to buy a gift for kids, and kids that have not already made their Christmas wish clear, here are some of this year’s bestselling top toys that are bound to spread cheer and joy. Top Play Pets Furreal is back with this bestselling […]









About



				Stuccu diary is the part of Stuccu dedicated to interacting with our customers. We want to interact with, and to get to know our customers a little better. We want to know what you enjoy reading about, what you want to read about, and your opinions on what we write. We are open to hearing whatever you have to say! Just leave us a comment!			
Recent PostsLittle Touches for your Home7 months agoThe Accessories to Top-off Your Style7 months ago4 Irresistibly Cute Baby Gifts7 months agoBudget Headphones For Music Buffs8 months ago10 Gifts for Dessert Lovers8 months agoKeeping it Cool in the Kitchen8 months agoMost Commented PostsHome Organization for $10 or Less9 commentsIt's Here: The Top Ten Toys of 20158 comments10 Home Decorating Ideas to Renew your Home this Fall7 commentsThe Secret to Buying Makeup Online7 comments5 Tips for Buying Jewelry Online6 commentsMarathon Running: The Basic Gear Guide4 commentsMost Loved PostsLittle Touches for your Home17 lovesIt's Here: The Top Ten Toys of 201512 lovesThe Accessories to Top-off Your Style10 lovesDIY Home Decor: Create your own Italian Palace9 lovesProducts that will make your Kitchen Fun9 loves4 Irresistibly Cute Baby Gifts9 lovesTagsamazon echo
back to school sales
bedroom decorating ideas
Black Friday
Books
Budget
Christmas
Cooking
Cyber Monday
diy home decor
England
fashion
fashion trends
fathers day
For Him
France
gift
gift guide
Gifts
gift store
how to start running
independence day
iPhone
jewelry
Kindle
LG
men fashion
Musical Instruments
Playstation 4
presents
Samsung
Scotland
Smartphones
Sony
Summer
Super Bowl
Sweden
Thanksgiving
Travel
Valentine's
Valentine’s Day
Watch
Winter
workout at home
Xbox One




















Enhance Product Development | Industrial Design, Engineering & Prototyping



































 








877.993.6426
support@enhancepd.com
 

 
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 







You've Got The Idea...
Team up with Enhance to bring your invention to life and get it to market!


 



Have a New Invention Idea?
 




If you have an invention idea or new product, we want to hear from you. At Enhance Product Development, we help inventors develop and launch their new invention ideas. Simply put, “We turn ideas into REALITY.”
So if you are an entrepreneur who has been working on a new invention for years or if you’re an inventor who just came up with a new idea for a product, we can help!
 
 

Request FREE Inventor Information
100% Confidential. No Obligation Consultation.
How to Reach Me 

 
 


If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank.			



































Best Describes Me 				
 -Please Select-
Inventor aspiring for a royalty or license deal.
Entrepreneur seeking to bring new product to market.
Company wanting to add to existing product line.






























If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank. 				



















All information remains confidential.  Must be 18 years or older.
 
 
 
 




Experience the Enhance Difference
 
 
 




Timely Support
There’s no maze or dialing tree, call us and reach a live person.
 
 
 



Advanced Technology
From the CAD software to the 3D printer in our office, we are cutting edge.
 
 
 



Innovative Ideas
As a smaller design firm, our culture embodies “out of the box” thinking.
 
 
 
 


%
Industrial Design

 

%
Engineering & Prototyping

 

%
Licensing

 

%
Marketing

 
 
 



Retail Partners
Our products have sold or are currently selling in
 
 
 


 

 

 

 
 
 




What Enhance Clients Are Saying
 
 
 



I am almost at a loss for words… Everything from the consultation to the sketches was terrific. Words can’t explain how impressed I was with the effort and how everything was completed in a timely manner.
Theodis H.
Honolulu, HI
 
 
 






Get Started Today!

Fill Out The Form Above

 


The 3D renderings, logo and sell sheet were awesome! I was very pleased with the feedback that was provided along the way and I’m extremely pleased on how quick my drawings came alive for me.
Joe K.
Dubuque, IA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 





























	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started









































Contact | Enhance Product Development



































 






877.993.6426
support@enhancepd.com



Facebook




Twitter




RSS


  





Facebook




Twitter




RSS



  
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 







Contact Enhance
Call, email or fill out the form below. We want to hear from you.


 



Receive a FREE, no obligation consultation.
Confidentiality guaranteed.
 



 
 



If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank.			


























































Message 				






If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank. 				



















 
 

Enhance Product Development, Inc.
Address:
11180 Zealand Ave N, Minneapolis, MN 55316
Phone: 877.99.ENHANCE (877.993.6426)
Fax: 651.846.5039
Email: support@enhancepd.com
Business Hours:
8:00am – 5:00pm M-F (Central Time)
 
 
 
 





 
 
 
 
 
 
 




































New Invention and Product Portfolio | Enhance



































 






877.993.6426
support@enhancepd.com



Facebook




Twitter




RSS


  





Facebook




Twitter




RSS



  
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 











EggZact Boiler

Improving cooking processes

See more work
 
 
 



Skillet Slingers

Kitchen tools designed specifically for the job

See more work
 
 
 
 
 
 



PUSHING THE BOUNDARIES OF CONVENTIONAL THINKING
 
We’ve worked on a range of products, from housewares to exercise equipment.
Take a look at some of the work we’re most proud of.
 
 
 
 
 








Grease Genie










HurriClean










Smart Capo










True Touch










MOBI










EggZact Boiler










Hot Buns










Skillet Slingers










Xtreme Rollers





 
 




Interested in working on a project?

Contact Us

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 






















Invention Design, Product Development & Licensing | Enhance




































 






877.993.6426
support@enhancepd.com



Facebook




Twitter




RSS


  





Facebook




Twitter




RSS



  
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 











Do You Have a New Invention Idea?

If you have an invention idea or new product, we want to hear from you.
At Enhance, we help inventors develop and launch their new invention or product ideas.

License Your Invention
 
 
 




From Concept to Manufacturing

Developing products is what we do.
From entrepreneurs to start-ups to established consumer product companies,
let Enhance innovate for you.

Services
 
 
 
 
 
 



Launch Your Invention Through Licensing
Our proprietary Design for Licensing strategy utilizes a proven system that seeks to maximize your success while minimizing out-of-pocket expense.
 
 
 




Prepare
Determine goals, research the marketplace and chart a course of action.
 
 
 



Develop
Design and develop your invention to meet or exceed your specs.
 
 
 



Protect
Acquire and protect your intellectual property by filing the patent application.
 
 
 



Launch
Professionally present your invention to companies for licensing.
 
 
 
 



Having been involved in licensing for over a decade, we have extensive experience with what licensees are looking for and have developed our design packages and method of establishing a license deal with one goal in mind: attracting a company to take your invention and pay you a royalty.

Help For Inventors

 
 
 






Team up with the Invention Experts
The most important part of successfully getting your invention idea to market is to establish an experienced team with an array of critical skill sets. With our knowledge in product design, invention development, marketing and licensing, Enhance is the team that can help lift your invention to success!


About Us

 
 
 




%
Industrial Design

 

%
Engineering and Prototyping

 

%
Licensing

 

%
Marketing

 
 
 



Overview of Product Design and Development Services
Whether you are a first-time inventor, a small start-up or an established company, Enhance can complement your business by delivering inspirational product design and development that will drive your bottom line.
 
 
 




Industrial Design
Taking an invention or product concept into reality is a core concern of our industrial design services.  Our mission is to optimize function, value and appearance for the mutual benefit of the product user and the manufacturer.  This means we seek to design both an aesthetically pleasing product, but also one that is commercially feasible.
 
 
 



Engineering and Prototyping
Getting samples for presentations or proof of concept is a crucial step to test how a product will function, as well as survey interest from potential customers or licensees. Enhance has the capabilities of making you a part through the use of the best technologies in rapid prototyping, from fused deposition modeling (FDM), stereolithography (SLA), and more.
 
 
 



Manufacturing Sourcing
Finding a source to manufacture a quality product at low prices and with reasonable terms is one of the most challenging aspects to commercializing a product. Sourcing is of utmost strategic importance and can make or break a product’s success. Enhance can help you navigate the complicated maze of locating and working with a factory overseas or in the US.
 
 
 
 




Marketing
From professionally designed sell sheets to product animation demonstrations or even full video production, Enhance can prepare the materials to make an impact in your presentation. From retailers to customers, licensees to investors, our work will give your product a professional appearance that will capture attention.
 
 
 



Licensing
Licensing your invention idea involves collaborating with companies well positioned to commercialize your product and pay a royalty. Enhance can leverage the product development to tailor a design package that attracts companies who will license your invention and pay you royalties.
 
 
 



Patents
Patent searches provide inventors with critical industry information and Provisional Patent Applications can be the first step to protecting your invention. Enhance has a streamlined and professional process that utilizes a registered patent attorney.
 
 
 
 




Services Overview

 
 
 

Our Design Work







Grease Genie










HurriClean










Smart Capo










True Touch










MOBI










EggZact Boiler










Hot Buns










Skillet Slingers










Xtreme Rollers





 
 



Retail Partners
Our products have sold or are selling in:
 
 
 


 

 

 

 
 
 





Connect With Us
Have questions or want to get started on a new invention or product?

Get Started Today

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 





















Intralink-Spine Inc. Company Profile




























































BioPortfolio
Biotech, Healthcare and Medical Resources































Advertisement

Topics


All Topics
Biotechnology
Biotech Business
Biotech Products
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Dermatology
Drug Discovery
Endocrinology
Gastroenterology
Immunology
Infectious Diseases
Mental Health
Neurology
Obstetrics
Orthopedics
Public Health
Respiratory
Rheumatology
Urology 
			Track topics on Twitter
Track topics that are important to you




Printed From BioPortfolio.com

Intralink-Spine Inc. Company Profile

02:25 EDT 29th July 2017 | BioPortfolio










Intralink-Spine Inc. (ILS) is privately held by Orthopeutics LP (OLP, Georgetown, TX) and a group of angel investors.  OLP is a biotechnology innovator founded in September of 2004 to develop and commercialize revolutionary non-surgical solutions for common orthopaedic problems.  OLP's general partner is Ampac Biotechnology, Inc. also located in Georgetown, TX.  Ampac was founded in 2001 when it was awarded an STTR Phase I grant from the NIH. 


News Articles
[274 Associated News Articles listed on BioPortfolio]
Exciting New Data for Intralink-Spine’s Réjuve Treatment for Low Back Pain
Additional findings at the six-month juncture from its early safety and 
      feasibility study, Intralink-Spine, 
      Inc. (ILS) indicates that the Réjuve™ 
      System effectively elim...
A good night's sleep rests on your spine's biomechanics
A three-year study by QUT biomedical researchers in the Paediatric Spine Research Group (PSRG) aims to deepen our understanding of the concepts of comfort by using new techniques to look at how the sp...
PJK risk following lumbar spinal fusion depends on level of spine fused, study shows
The surgical correction of adult spinal deformities often involves realigning the lower portion of the spine, or the 'lumbar' spine.
Spine Surgeries Moving to Outpatient Facilities with 23-hour Observation
Spine surgery trends show that a greater proportion of spine surgeries are moving to an outpatient hospital setting, but fewer are moving to ASCs, according to a new study.
Low-dose CT of the whole spine found more sensitive than conventional radiographs in monitoring AS
MADRID — In patients with ankylosing spondylitis, low-dose CT of the whole spine delivered greater sensitivity than imaging with conventional radiographs, according to a study presented at the EULAR...
Titan Spine Appoints Spine Industry Expert As Vice President Of Professional Development
  Life Sciences Jobs                                                 ...
Risk Factors of Cervical Spine Instabilities in RA
A study explores the prognostic factors that may identify the risk of cervical spine instabilities among patients with rheumatoid arthritis.   Spine
VP of professional development named by Titan Spine
Ed Graubart, who has over 27 years of sales team infrastructure and personnel building experience in the spine field, has bee -More- 


Drugs and Medications
[43 Associated Drugs and Medications listed on BioPortfolio]
Letrozole [APP Pharmaceuticals, LLC]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use Letrozole Tablets, USP safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Letrozole Tablets, USP Letrozole Tablets, USPIniti...
Letrozole [Kremers Urban Pharmaceuticals Inc.]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use letrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for letrozole tablets. LETROZOLE Tablets, USPInitial U.S. A...
Letrozole [Qualitest Pharmaceuticals]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use Letrozole Tablets, USP safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Letrozole Tablets, USP. Letrozole Tablets, USPInit...
Anastrozole [Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Limited ]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use anastrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for Anastrozole Tablets. Anastrozole tablet for oral useI...
Anastrozole [Breckenridge Pharmaceutical, Inc.]
These highlights do not include all the information needed to use anastrozole tablets safely and effectively. See full prescribing information for anastrozole tablets. Initial U.S. ApprovalAnastrozole...


PubMed Articles
[945 Associated PubMed Articles listed on BioPortfolio]
Expert's comment concerning Grand Rounds case entitled "Thoracic osteotomy for Gorham-Stout disease of the spine: a case report and literature review" by C. Maillot et al., Eur Spine J: doi 10.1007/s00586-014-3613-3.

The Michel Benoist and Robert Mulholland yearly European Spine Journal Review: a survey of the "surgical and research" articles in the European Spine Journal, 2016.

Is Intraoperative Local Vancomycin Powder the Answer to Surgical Site Infections in Spine Surgery?
This is a retrospective cohort comparative study of all patients who underwent instrumented spine surgery at a single institution.
Letter to the Editor concerning "Association between IGF1 gene single nucleotide polymorphism (rs5742612) and adolescent idiopathic scoliosis: a meta-analysis" by M. Guan et al. (Eur Spine J; 2016. doi:10.1007/s00586-016-4742-7).

Answer to the Letter to the Editor of F. Sanchez-Mariscal et al. concerning "Risk of revision surgery for adult idiopathic scoliosis: a survival analysis of 517 cases over 25 years" by G. Riouallon et al. (Eur Spine J; 2016;25(8):2527-2534).



Clinical Trials
[528 Associated Clinical Trials listed on BioPortfolio]
Evaluation of Spine Surgery Analgesic Pathway
Investigators plan to study the role of spine surgery analgesic pathways - for procedures
      with high risk of postoperative pain - in improving the quality of recovery
Observational Clinical Study to Plan, Position and Check Instrument Placement for Spine Surgery.
There is a clear need in spine surgery to place pedicle screws in the right place in the
      spine with good accuracy to avoid damage to important structures (spinal cord, nerve roots
      or verte...
Single Versus Multifraction Salvage Spine Stereotactic Radiosurgery for Previously Irradiated Spinal Metastases
The goal of this clinical research study is to learn whether delivering spine radiosurgery
      in a single large dose is better than delivering spine radiosurgery over 3 smaller doses.

      Resear...
Thermal Ablation and Stereotactic Spine Radiosurgery (SSRS)
The goal of this clinical research study is to find out if combining thermal ablation (using
      a laser to heat tumor tissue in order to shrink the tumor size) and spine stereotactic
      radiosur...
Understanding Non-Response in Spine Fusion Surgery
To identify patient characteristics associated with non-response after spine fusion surgery
      for the treatment of degenerative disc disease (DDD).


Companies
[191 Associated Companies listed on BioPortfolio]
Intralink-Spine Inc.
Intralink-Spine Inc. (ILS) is privately held by Orthopeutics LP (OLP, Georgetown, TX) and a group of angel investors.  OLP is a biotechnology innovator founded in September of 2004 to develop and comm...
Intralink-Spine, Inc.

X-spine Systems, Inc.
X-spine (www.x-spine.com) 
      is a global developer and manufacturer of novel technologies for the 
      treatment of spinal disease. Based in Ohio, privately-held X-spine 
      markets sp...
Precision Spine, Inc.
Precision Spine, Inc. is a privately held company with its executive 
      headquarters in Parsippany, NJ. Precision Spine is the parent company of 
      its wholly owned subsidiaries, Spinal...
Precision Spine Inc.
Precision Spine, Inc., is a privately held company headquartered in 
      Parsippany, New Jersey, with manufacturing facilities in Pearl, 
      Mississippi. Precision Spine is dedicated to pr...

More Information about "Intralink-Spine Inc." on BioPortfolio
We have published hundreds of Intralink-Spine Inc. news stories on BioPortfolio along with dozens of Intralink-Spine Inc. Clinical Trials and PubMed Articles about Intralink-Spine Inc. for you to read. In addition to the medical data, news and clinical trials, BioPortfolio also has a large collection of Intralink-Spine Inc. Companies in our database. You can also find out about relevant Intralink-Spine Inc. Drugs and Medications on this site too.





Quick LinksAdvanced Search |
					Login |
					Subscribe | 
					RSS 

Quick Search






Advertisement


 

Relevant Topics
Biotechnology
Antibodies
 
  Antisense
 
  Assays
 
  Biochips
 
  Bioinformatics
 
  Biological Therapy
 
  Biomarkers
 
  Biomaterials
 
  Bioscience
 
  Cell Culture
 
  Cloning
 
  Cytokine
 
  Diagnostics
 
  Dna Extraction
 
  Dna Sequencing
 
  Dna Transform...
Collaborations in biotechnology
Commercial and academic collaborations are used throughout the biotechnology and pharmaceutical sector to enhance research and product development.

 Collaborations can take the form of research and evaluation agreements, licensing, partnerships etc.

 
...




Corporate Database Quicklinks
Search Corporate Database
Latest Corporate Records
Biotech Companies by Location
Popular Company Records
Recent Company Searches
Add or Control Your Corporate Profile


Searches Linking to this Company Record


















BioPortfolio Limited

About Us
Contact Us

Social Media

Twitter (200+ Accounts)
Twitter 
Google+ 
LinkedIn 



Publish Content

Publish
Publish Your Press Release
Advertise

Agreements

Agreements
Medical Disclaimer
Privacy



Tools

MyBioPortfolio
RSS

Help

FAQs
Sitemaps
XML Sitemap







			This site complies with the
			HONcode standard for trustworthy health
			information:
Verify here.



		The information provided by BioPortfolio.com is not a substitute for
		professional medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. The BioPortfolio
		site is sponsored BioPortfolio Limited with offices at Stafford House,
		10 Prince of Wales Road, Dorchester, DT1 1PW, England. If you
		are a legal copyright holder or a designated agent for such and you believe a
		post on this website falls outside the boundaries of “Fair Use” and
		legitimately infringes on your or your client's copyright we may be contacted
		concerning copyright matters at: priority@bioportfolio.com.
		
		All rights reserved. All other trademarks recognized. Copyright
		© 1997-2017 BioPortfolio Limited. Site developed by
		Alacrify Ltd.
	














